South Dakota, session 2026, SB122.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 22-16:
A person commits the offense of failure to summon aid for a suicide attempt if the
person:
(1) Is physically present at the scene of the attempt;
(2) Knows that another individual is attempting suicide or has inflicted self-harm that
creates an imminent risk of serious bodily injury; and
(3) Intentionally fails to promptly summon assistance by contacting law enforcement,
medical personnel, or another person reasonably likely to secure immediate
emergency assistance.
A violation of this section is a Class 1 misdemeanor.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 22-16:
It is a defense to section 1 of this Act if:
(1) The person:
(a) Reasonably feared imminent harm to self or others;
(b) Reasonably believed aid had already been summoned; or
(c) Is under the age of eighteen; or
(2) It was otherwise not reasonably possible for the person to summon aid.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.